South Dakota, session 2026, SB151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 12-5:
A county auditor shall forward to the secretary of state:
(1) The name of each candidate for precinct committeeman or committeewoman, upon
the filing of the candidate's statement pursuant to § 12-5-4;
(2) The results of each election for precinct committeeman or committeewoman held
at the primary election, pursuant to § 12-5-4 to 12-5-13, inclusive; and
(3) Each precinct committeeman or committeewoman who had no opposing candidate
and was automatically elected, pursuant to § 12-5-4.1.
The secretary of state shall post the names of each candidate for precinct
committeeman or committeewoman and the results of each election for committeeman or
committeewoman on the secretary of state's website.
Section 2. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in full force
and effect from and after its passage and approval.

26.786.18 2 151
An Act to require the publication of the results of an election for precinct committeeman or
committeewoman and to declare an emergency.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 151
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 151 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB151 ENROLLED